North Carolina, session 2025, HB931.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The title of Article 7B of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes reads as
rewritten:
"Notification of Towing.Towing and Towing Fees and Practices."
SECTION 2. Article 7B of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 20-219.25. Towing fees and practices.
(a) All fees charged by a towing company shall be reasonable and not excessive and shall
be clearly and conspicuously disclosed to the operator of the vehicle. This disclosure shall occur
before the towing, if possible, and may be conducted with signage, such as the signage described
in G.S. 20-219.2(a).
(b) A towing company shall not tow a car to a location that does not offer recovery of the
towed vehicle within 24 hours of being towed.
(c) A towing company shall not charge a storage fee for days when the company is not
open from at least 9:00 A.M. to 4:00 P.M. Unless a towing company is open for the recovery of
a towed vehicle 24 hours per day, a towing company shall not charge a storage fee for a towed
vehicle until at least one business day has elapsed since the towed vehicle could first be
recovered.
(d) A towing company shall accept payment with a debit card, credit card, and cash at
any time during its operating hours, including at the time of towing. If a towing company charges
a payment processing fee greater than two percent (2%) of the owed amount, the payment
processing fee shall be equal to the actual cost of processing the payment.
(e) The Utilities Commission may adopt rules to implement this section. In accordance
with G.S. 62-34, the Public Staff of the Utilities Commission may investigate a towing company
to determine whether the towing company has complied with this section and rules adopted under
it. The Utilities Commission may assess a civil penalty against a person that violates this section
or rules adopted under it, not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each violation. The
clear proceeds of civil penalties imposed pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted to the Civil
Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with G.S. 115C-457.2. The Utilities Commission may
also take other appropriate enforcement action, including ordering a person to cease and desist
from violating this section or rules adopted under it.
(f) In determining whether a fee is reasonable and not excessive under subsection (a) of
this section, the Utilities Commission shall consider all of the following factors:
*H931-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Whether the fee is proportional to the cost of service.
(2) The reason for which the towing company charges the fee.
(3) Any other factor determined appropriate by the Utilities Commission.
(g) A violation of this section or rules adopted under it is an unfair and deceptive trade
practice under G.S. 75-1.1."
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 931-First Edition